output.aff
SFX O N 73
SFX O   ok          ky         ok
SFX O   ok          ka         ok
SFX O   ok          kov        ok
SFX O   ok          ku         ok
SFX O   ok          kom        ok
SFX O   ok          koch       ok
SFX O   ok          kom        ok
SFX O   ok          kami       ok
SFX O   el          ly         el
SFX O   el          lu         el
SFX O   el          lov        el
SFX O   el          lom        el
SFX O   el          le         el
SFX O   el          loch       el
SFX O   el          lami       el
SFX O   ol          ly         ol
SFX O   ol          la         ol
SFX O   ol          lov        ol
SFX O   ol          lu         ol
SFX O   ol          lom        ol
SFX O   ol          le         ol
SFX O   ol          loch       ol
SFX O   ol          lom        ol
SFX O   ol          lami       ol
SFX O   em          my         jem
SFX O   em          mov        jem
SFX O   em          mu         jem
SFX O   em          mom        jem
SFX O   em          me         jem
SFX O   em          moch       jem
SFX O   em          mom        jem
SFX O   em          mami       jem
SFX O   en          ny         en
SFX O   en          na         en
SFX O   en          nov        en
SFX O   en          nu         en
SFX O   en          nom        en
SFX O   en          ne         en
SFX O   en          noch       en
SFX O   en          nami       en
SFX O   ietor       etry       ietor
SFX O   ietor       etra       ietor
SFX O   ietor       etrov      ietor
SFX O   ietor       etru       ietor
SFX O   ietor       etrom      ietor
SFX O   ietor       etre       ietor
SFX O   ietor       etroch     ietor
SFX O   ietor       etrom      ietor
SFX O   ietor       etrami     ietor
SFX O   or          ry         [^t]or
SFX O   or          ra         [^kt]or
SFX O   or          rov        [^t]or
SFX O   or          ru         [^t]or
SFX O   or          rom        [^t]or
SFX O   or          re         [^t]or
SFX O   or          roch       [^t]or
SFX O   or          rom        [^t]or
SFX O   or          rami       [^t]or
SFX O   et          ty         et
SFX O   et          tu         et
SFX O   et          tov        et
SFX O   et          tom        et
SFX O   et          te         et
SFX O   et          toch       et
SFX O   et          tami       et
SFX O   ov          vy         ov
SFX O   ov          vu         ov
SFX O   ov          vov        ov
SFX O   ov          vom        ov
SFX O   ov          ve         ov
SFX O   ov          voch       ov
SFX O   ov          vom        ov
SFX O   ov          vami       ov

SFX Q N 52
SFX Q   ia          i          cia
SFX Q   0           m          [cs]ia
SFX Q   0           ch         [cs]ia
SFX Q   0           mi         [cs]ia
SFX Q   esia        ies        esia
SFX Q   ia          i          dia
SFX Q   dia         dom        dia
SFX Q   dia         doch       dia
SFX Q   dia         dmi        dia
SFX Q   ice         ic         ice
SFX Q   ce          c          oce
SFX Q   ere         ier        ere
SFX Q   ere         eri        ere
SFX Q   e           iam        [cl]e
SFX Q   e           iach       [cl]e
SFX Q   e           ami        ce
SFX Q   le          lami       le
SFX Q   e           ov         are
SFX Q   e           om         are
SFX Q   e           och        are
SFX Q   e           mi         are
SFX Q   e           am         [^a]re
SFX Q   e           ach        [^a]re
SFX Q   e           ami        [^a]re
SFX Q   niaze       nazi       niaze
SFX Q   e           om         ze
SFX Q   e           och        ze
SFX Q   e           mi         ze
SFX Q   i           i          ci
SFX Q   0           am         ci
SFX Q   0           ach        ci
SFX Q   0           ami        ci
SFX Q   0           ch         ti
SFX Q   0           m          ti
SFX Q   0           mi         ti
SFX Q   echy        iech       echy
SFX Q   ky          ok         ky
SFX Q   ny          n          i[aeou][djkntv]iny
SFX Q   iny         in         [^i][aeiouy][djkntv]iny
SFX Q   iny         in         stiny
SFX Q   ny          n          [^aeiouy][djknv]iny
SFX Q   y           am         [hkn]y
SFX Q   y           ach        [hkn]y
SFX Q   y           ami        [hkn]y
SFX Q   asy         ias        asy
SFX Q   asy         asom       asy
SFX Q   asy         asoch      asy
SFX Q   asy         asmi       asy
SFX Q   ta          t          ta
SFX Q   0           m          ta
SFX Q   0           ch         ta
SFX Q   0           mi         ta
