output.dic
abrahamoviny/Q
akty/Q
alimenty/Q
alkalie/Q
Alpy/Q
analy/Q
Antily/Q
Antverpy/Q
archivalie/Q
Ateny/Q
Azory/Q
bakchanalie/Q
balicek/BO
bedra/Q
Benatky/Q
bermudy/Q
Beskydy/Q
bicie/Q
bielok/O
bikiny/Q
bitunok/O
bobok/O
boby/Q
Bohunice/Q
Brdy/Q
Bremy/Q
Bruggy/Q
bubienok/O
carok/O
cecok/O
celok/O
cerealie/Q
cicerok/O
cisarovna/O
cukor/O
cachre/Q
cary/Q
Cechy/Q
clankonozce/Q
clanok/O
clenok/O
clnok/O
cpavok/O
criepok/O
Dardanely/Q
data/Q
dejiny/Q
Delfy/Q
desiati/Q
desiatok/O
detiska/Q
deturence/Q
detvaky/Q
devatdesiati/Q
devatnasti/Q
deviati/Q
Dezerice/Q
diavyrobok/O
diety/Q
dievcence/Q
dneskajsok/O
dnesok/O
dobytok/O
dodatok/O
dochodok/O
dojem/O
doplatok/O
doplnok/O
dosledok/O
dostatok/O
dostihy/Q
dovazok/O
dovetok/O
dozinky/Q
driapacky/Q
drobky/Q
druhohory/Q
drumblence/Q
drzky/Q
dudok/O
dupaciky/Q
dupacky/Q
dusok/O
dvanasti/Q
dvercia/Q
dvere/Q
dvierka/Q
dvojicky/Q
dvojnasobok/O
dvojzmysel/O
dychadla/Q
dzinsy/Q
elektropriemysel/O
errata/Q
Falklandy/Q
fasiangy/Q
fekalie/Q
Filipiny/Q
financie/Q
fotoclanok/O
fotokruzok/O
gajdicky/Q
gajdy/Q
Galapagy/Q
galeje/Q
ganok/O
gate/Q
gatky/Q
genitalie/Q
golfky/Q
gorodky/Q
Grampiany/Q
habky/Q
habocky/Q
haby/Q
hambalok/O
hambalok/O
harok/O
Helsinky/Q
hemoroidy/Q
Himalaje/Q
hnutie/QV
hodinky/Q
hodiny/Q
hody/Q
hostia/Q
hrable/Q
hrasok/O
Hromnice/Q
hromobitie/QV
hrotok/O
husle/Q
chladok/O
chlebicek/O
chudence/Q
chyzna/O
ihlicie/Q
insignie/Q
Jacovce/Q
jarok/O
jasle/Q
jaslicky/Q
Jasy/Q
jedenasti/IQ
jedny/Q
juvenilie/Q
kachle/Q
kaliopky/Q
kalisok/O
kamienok/O
Karpaty/Q
kasarne/Q
kastanety/Q
Katovice/Q
kiahne/Q
klieste/Q
klubovky/Q
kmitocet/O
knazna/O
kolok/O
kombinacky/Q
komorna/O
korale/Q
Kordillery/Q
korienok/O
korok/O
korovie/Q
Kosariska/Q
Kosice/Q
kozusok/O
kralovna/KO
krciazok/O
krcok/O
krize/Q
krosienka/Q
krosna/Q
krstiny/Q
krupobitie/QV
kruzok/O
kupele/Q
Kurily/Q
kusok/O
kvasnice/Q
kvasok/O
kvietok/O
Kysuce/Q
Ladce/Q
lazok/O
lepok/O
leta/Q
letohradok/O
letok/O
letopocet/O
Levice/Q
liace/Q
liadok/O
listok/O
litanie/Q
lopusie/Q
ludia/Q
ludkovia/Q
lud/Q
Lukovistia/Q
lulok/O
lupienok/O
machle/Q
majetok/O
Maldivy/Q
memoare/Q
Michalovce/Q
mineralie/Q
misie/Q
mlatok/O
mliecie/Q
Mlynarovce/Q
monoclanok/O
monterky/Q
motuzok/O
nabrezie/Q
nabytok/O
nacionalie/Q
nacrtok/O
nadbytok/O
nadvyrobok/O
nahovaracky/Q
nahovarky/Q
nahrobok/O
nahubok/O
naprotivok/O
naprstok/O
naramok/O
narodeniny/Q
nasledok/O
nasobok/O
natrubok/O
naturalie/Q
naustok/O
navazok/O
nazov/O
nebesa/Q
nebesia/Q
nedoplatok/O
nedorastok/O
nedorobok/O
nedostatok/O
Nedozery/Q
nejedni/Q
nejedny/Q
nepodarok/O
neurcitok/O
nezaujem/O
nezmysel/O
nohavice/Q
nohavicky/Q
noviny/Q
noznice/Q
noznicky/Q
oberky/Q
oblecok/O
obojok/O
obrazok/O
obrezok/O
obrusok/O
obtlacok/O
obusok/O
ocielok/O
oci/Q
odkrojok/O
odliatok/O
odpadky/Q
odpocet/O
odpocinok/O
odpustky/Q
odrezok/O
odstrizok/O
odstiepok/O
odtienok/O
odtlacok/O
odvarok/O
odzemok/O
oflinok/O
ohorok/O
ohryzok/O
oklasok/O
okolky/Q
okovy/Q
okrsok/O
okrusok/O
okuliare/Q
opalok/O
opasok/O
opatok/O
orgie/Q
oriesok/O
orol/O
osemdesiati/Q
osidla/Q
osol/O
ostarok/O
ostatok/O
ostredok/O
osypky/Q
oskvarok/O
ostiepok/O
oteplovacky/Q
otruby/Q
ovacie/Q
paberky/Q
pacesy/Q
pahorok/O
pancuchace/Q
parok/O
pasienok/O
pastorale/Q
pastorok/O
patdesiatiny/Q
patdesiati/Q
patnasobok/O
penale/Q
peniaze/Q
peniazky/Q
personalie/Q
piati/Q
piatok/O
Pieniny/Q
piesok/O
Piestany/Q
pichacky/Q
pirozok/O
pixel/O
placky/Q
plamienok/O
plavky/Q
Plejady/Q
pliesok/O
pluca/Q
pluzok/O
pocet/O
pociatok/O
pocty/Q
podarunok/O
podbradok/O
podolok/O
podpatok/O
podpriecinok/O
podspodok/O
podstienok/O
podtitulok/O
podvazok/O
podvesok/O
podvozok/O
pohrobok/O
pojem/O
poklesok/O
pokrutiny/Q
polharok/O
polospanok/O
polovyrobok/O
poltucet/O
pomery/Q
Pompeje/Q
pomyje/Q
pondelok/O
popevok/O
poplatok/O
poprasok/O
poriadok/NO
posledok/O
posmesok/O
posudok/O
posunok/O
poskrabok/O
potomok/CO
povrazok/O
pozajtrajsok/O
pozemok/O
pozlatka/Q
poznatok/O
pozostatok/O
pozitok/O
pracujuci/NQY
prah/BO
prahory/Q
pramienok/O
prasok/O
prazdniny/Q
prebytok/O
preddavok/O
predok/CO
predsudok/O
prehresok/O
preplatok/O
prepocet/O
prevazok/O
prezitok/O
pribytok/O
pricesok/O
pridavok/O
pridomok/O
priecinok/O
priehlavok/O
priemysel/O
prieramok/O
priestupok/O
priezvedy/Q
prijem/O
prilepok/O
primesok/O
primicie/Q
pripecok/O
pripisok/O
pripitok/O
priplatok/O
pripravok/O
prirastok/O
prispevok/O
pristavok/O
pristresok/O
pristupky/Q
prisudok/O
pristipok/O
privarok/O
privesok/O
privlastok/O
prostriedok/O
protiucet/O
protivietor/O
prsia/Q
prstienok/O
pruzok/O
prvohory/Q
prvok/O
prvopociatok/O
prvovyrobok/O
pumpky/Q
pupienok/O
pupok/O
Pyreneje/Q
pytacky/Q
radok/O
radovanky/Q
rajtky/Q
ranajky/Q
razporok/O
realie/Q
recicky/Q
remienok/O
reparacie/Q
represalie/Q
rezok/O
riadok/O
rodidla/Q
roraty/Q
rozmysel/O
rozpaky/Q
rozparok/O
rozpocet/O
rozsudok/O
rozok/O
rukavce/Q
rukoviatka/Q
Rysy/Q
sane/Q
sanky/Q
sedemdesiatiny/Q
sedemdesiati/Q
sekana/O
sen/O
servitok/O
schodok/O
sklonok/O
skrajok/O
skrcok/CO
skripta/Q
skrojok/O
skusy/Q
skutok/O
slinok/O
smiesok/O
Smizany/Q
smrcok/O
smriecok/BO
smutok/O
spanok/O
splasky/Q
spodky/Q
spodok/O
spolok/O
stanok/O
stanovy/Q
starocia/Q
starohory/Q
statok/O
stopky/Q
stradivarky/Q
strecok/O
strmienok/O
stupienok/O
sucet/O
sudok/O
suchotiny/Q
suchoty/Q
svatostanok/O
sviatok/O
satocky/Q
satocky/Q
saty/Q
sestdesiatiny/Q
sestdesiati/Q
sestnasti/Q
skopok/O
skovranok/O
skrecok/O
skriatok/O
sortky/Q
sponovky/Q
stence/Q
stiepok/O
stitok/O
stocok/O
stranok/O
stranok/O
strkopiesok/O
stvorlistok/O
stvornasobok/O
stvrtohory/Q
stvrtok/O
sulok/O
svagrina/O
tacky/Q
tapulienky/Q
tapusky/Q
Tatry/Q
telce/Q
teplaciky/Q
teplaky/Q
terajsok/O
termoclanok/O
testina/O
texasky/Q
timbre/Q
titulok/O
Tlmace/Q
traciky/Q
tracky/Q
traky/Q
trampoty/Q
trapy/Q
trenirky/Q
trenky/Q
tretohory/Q
tridsiatok/O
trojicky/Q
trojlistok/O
trojnasobok/O
tropy/Q
trunok/O
tucet/O
Turice/Q
ubytok/O
ucet/O
ucinok/O
uhol/O
ujcina/O
ulomok/O
ulovok/O
umysel/O
upadok/O
uplatok/O
uponok/O
uryvok/O
usmesok/O
usta/Q
ustrizok/O
ustupok/O
usudok/O
usklabok/O
uskrnok/O
utorok/O
utrapy/Q
utroby/Q
utrzok/O
utulok/O
uvazok/O
uvodzovky/Q
uzol/O
uzitok/O
vacok/O
vacok/O
valok/O
vanok/O
vcerajsok/O
vecierok/O
velhory/Q
veraje/Q
viacnasobok/O
Vianoce/Q
vidly/Q
vienok/O
vietor/O
vichor/O
vlacuhy/Q
vlanajsok/O
vlasok/O
vlcok/O
vnutrajsok/O
vohlady/Q
volky/Q
vonkajsok/O
Vrable/Q
vradla/Q
vrata/Q
vratka/Q
vrcholok/O
vriedok/O
vrsok/O
vrsok/O
vrubok/O
Vselince/Q
vybezok/O
vycnelok/O
vydavok/O
vydobytok/O
vyhonok/O
vyklenok/O
vyklepky/Q
vykovok/O
vylisok/O
vylucok/O
vymenok/O
vymysel/O
vynatok/O
vypadok/O
vypalky/Q
vypestok/O
vypisok/O
vyplnok/O
vypocet/O
vyprazok/O
vypustok/O
vyrastok/O
vyrobok/O
vysadok/O
vysledok/O
vystrelok/O
vystrizok/O
vystupok/O
vytazok/O
vytlacok/O
vyvalok/O
vyvarok/O
vyvazok/O
vyvratok/O
vyzvedy/Q
vyzinok/O
zaciatok/O
zadok/O
zahryzok/O
zahumienok/O
zajtrajsok/O
zakrpok/O
zakusok/O
zalety/Q
Zaluzice/Q
zamok/O
zamotok/O
zapisky/Q
zapocet/O
zaprdok/O
zarmutok/O
zarobok/O
zarodok/O
zasnuby/Q
zasevok/O
zatylok/O
zaujem/O
zavazok/O
zavdavok/O
zavitok/O
zazitok/O
Zbehy/Q
zbytok/O
zimomriavky/Q
zinok/O
zlievky/Q
zlomok/O
zmatok/O
zmysel/NO
zostatok/O
zositok/O
zovnajsok/O
zrkadlovky/Q
zrubok/O
zubok/O
zvazok/O
zvlace/Q
zvratok/O
zvrsok/O
zvysok/O
zaludok/O
zeleza/Q
Zeliezovce/Q
Zelmanovce/Q
Zemberovce/Q
Zemliare/Q
ziabre/Q
Zirany/Q
Zitavany/Q
zivel/O
zliabok/O
zltok/O
Zupcany/Q
